Idaho, session 2026, H0943.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The Legislature finds and declares
that:
(1) Reliable access to motor fuels and refined petroleum products is
essential to Idaho's economy, public safety, and quality of life, including
but not limited to agriculture, food production, manufacturing, construc-
tion, transportation, emergency services, health care, and commerce.
(2) Idaho does not currently have an in-state petroleum refining capac-
ity and therefore relies heavily on interstate transportation systems and
out-of-state fuel supplies to meet the needs of residents and businesses.
(3) Disruptions, constraints, and increased costs affecting in-
terstate fuel supply chains can result in higher fuel prices, reduced
availability, and economic harm to Idaho consumers, employers, and critical
services, particularly in a rural state where travel and transportation are
necessary.
(4) A resilient and diversified fuel supply system, including access to
multiple interstate pipeline routes and sources, reduces vulnerability to
supply disruptions, market volatility, and external policy or infrastruc-
ture constraints.
(5) Energy security is a matter of public safety and economic stability
for the State of Idaho. Ensuring access to reliable, sufficient, and diver-
sified supplies of motor fuels and refined petroleum products is essential
to protect Idaho residents, businesses, agriculture, emergency services,
and critical infrastructure from supply disruptions, price volatility, and
external market or policy constraints.
(6) Investment in modern, expanded, and reliable interstate pipeline
infrastructure promotes fuel supply stability, enhances energy security,
supports economic growth, and benefits consumers through improved market
access and competition.
(7) High-cost pipeline infrastructure projects require substantial
up-front capital investment and long-term regulatory certainty, and such
projects may not proceed without targeted incentives and a predictable,
timely permitting framework.


(8) The State of Idaho has a legitimate and compelling interest in
encouraging infrastructure investment that strengthens energy supply re-
silience, protects consumers from supply shocks, and supports the continued
functioning of Idaho's economy and essential services.
SECTION 2. That Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 46, Title 63, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 46
PROTECTING IDAHO PIPELINE ENERGY SECURITY ACT
63-4601. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Protecting Idaho Pipeline Energy Security Act" or the "PIPES Act."
63-4602. DEFINITIONS. For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Construction" means the development, installation, or creation of
a new pipeline or related facilities, including laterals, interconnections,
pumping stations, storage facilities, and associated infrastructure.
(2) "Developer" means any person or business entity, including an
owner, operator, developer, or investor, who engages in or proposes to en-
gage in the interstate transmission, storage, distribution, or delivery of
crude oil or refined petroleum products and is eligible for any incentive
provided in this chapter.
(3) "Energy security" means the availability of reliable, sufficient,
and diversified fuel supplies necessary to support economic activity, pub-
lic safety, and essential services within the state.
(4) "Pipeline" means real and personal property, including gathering
lines and fixtures, owned or operated to facilitate the interstate trans-
mission, storage, distribution, or delivery of crude oil or refined petro-
leum products through a pipe that has an outside diameter of at least six (6)
inches.
(5) "Refined petroleum products" means gasoline, diesel fuel, aviation
fuel, and other liquid products derived from crude oil that are intended for
use as motor fuel.
(6) "Strategic pipeline infrastructure project" means any phased or
multistage project where the developer certifies to the state tax commission
in writing that the aggregate investment will meet or exceed fifty million
dollars ($50,000,000) in new investment in construction of a new pipeline
that:
(a) Is not a replacement of an existing pipeline;
(b) Crosses into Idaho from an adjacent state or nation from which no
pipeline already exists; and
(c) Delivers crude oil or refined petroleum products to Idaho cus-
tomers.
63-4603. INCOME TAX CREDIT, PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION, AND SALES TAX EX-
EMPTION FOR STRATEGIC PIPELINE INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECTS.
(1)(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, a devel-
oper that places a strategic pipeline infrastructure project into ser-
vice is allowed an investment tax credit against any applicable tax im-


posed by chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code. The credit shall be equal to
thirty-five percent (35%) of the new infrastructure-related revenue.
For purposes of this section, "infrastructure-related revenue" means
an increase, if any, in the amount of revenue, in a taxable year, that is
attributable to the strategic pipeline infrastructure project.
(b) The credit allowed under this section may be claimed annually
through the taxable year that the earliest of the following occurs:
(i) The economic life of the strategic pipeline infrastructure
project has ended, provided that a developer shall provide the
state tax commission with such information as the state tax com-
mission may require to determine and certify the economic life of
the strategic pipeline infrastructure project;
(ii) Twenty (20) years have passed from the time the initial
credit was claimed; or
(iii) The developer has recovered fifty percent (50%) of the total
cost of the strategic pipeline infrastructure project through the
credit provided in this section.
(c) A developer seeking a credit under this section shall, for each tax-
able year, file a report with the state tax commission showing the in-
frastructure-related revenue. The report shall be prepared by an inde-
pendent certified public accountant that verifies the infrastructure-
related revenue described in paragraph (a) of this subsection in accor-
dance with generally accepted accounting principles.
(2) The construction of a pipeline on or after January 1, 2027, that is
the result of a completed strategic pipeline infrastructure project in Idaho
shall be exempt from real and personal property taxation.
(3) Beginning on January 1, 2027, the sale, lease, or purchase of tan-
gible property that is incorporated into the pipeline system as a component
part of the strategic pipeline infrastructure project is exempt from any
sales or use tax under Idaho law.
63-4604. REGULATORY RELIEF FOR STRATEGIC PIPELINE INFRASTRUCTURE
PROJECTS. (1) Except as otherwise required by federal law, a strategic
pipeline infrastructure project shall be exempt from any additional state
permitting, licensing, certification, environmental review, or any other
applicable statutory requirement.
(2) If a state agency is charged with implementing or enforcing any fed-
eral regulatory review and approval process in connection with a strategic
pipeline infrastructure project, such agency shall expedite and prioritize
such review or approval to the extent permitted by federal law.
(3) This section shall not be construed to prevent any county or city
permitting, licensing, certification, environmental review, or any other
applicable requirements.
(4) In the event a state agency, county, or city fails to issue a fi-
nal decision on an application for a permit, license, certification, or any
other applicable regulatory authorization within sixty (60) days, or within
the timeline mandated by federal law, whichever is shorter, the application
for any permit, license, certification, or other similar application shall
be deemed approved.


(5) State agencies, counties, cities, and all other political subdi-
visions shall give priority consideration to strategic pipeline infrastruc-
ture projects that materially enhance Idaho's energy security by:
(a) Increasing access to diversified interstate fuel supply sources;
(b) Improving redundancy or resiliency of fuel transportation infra-
structure; or
(c) Reducing Idaho's reliance on a limited number of supply corridors
or single-source markets.
63-4605. APPLICATION FOR FEDERAL GRANTS AND FINANCING PROGRAMS. State
agencies are authorized and directed to seek out all available federal
grants, state or federal low-interest or no-interest financing options, or
other similar state or federal programs that may be available to financially
or otherwise assist a business seeking to invest in and complete a strategic
pipeline infrastructure project.
SECTION 3. This act shall be in full force and effect on and after Jan-
uary 1, 2027.